en: Firming agent
bg: Втвърдител
ca: Enfortidor, enduridor, agent enduridor, agent enfortidor
cs: Zpevňující látka, zpevňující látky
da: Konsistensmiddel
de: Festigungsmittel
el: Σκληρυντικό
es: Endurecedor, Agentes endurecedores, Agente endurecedor
et: Tardaine
fi: Kiinteyttämisaine, Kiinteyttämisainetta, Kiinteyttämisaineet, Kiinteyttämisaineita
fr: Affermissant, agent affermissant
ga: Oibreán teannta
hr: učvršćivač, učvrščivać, učvršćivač za učvršćivanje, učvrščivač
hu: Szilárdítóanyag, szilárdító anyag
it: Agente di resistenza, agenti di resistenza
lt: Kietiklis
lv: Cietinātājs
mt: Aġent li jissoda
nl: Verstevigingsmiddel, Verstevigingsmiddelen
pl: Substancja wiążąca, Substancje wiążące
pt: Agente de endurecimento
ro: Agent de întărire
ru: уплотнитель
sk: Stužovadlo
sl: Utrjevalec
sv: Konsistensmedel

en: Natural firming agent
bg: Естествен уплътнител
ca: Agent de fermesa natural
cs: Přírodní zpevňující látka, přírodní zpevňující látky
da: Naturligt konsistensmiddel
de: Natürliches Festigungsmittel
el: Φυσικό σκληρυντικό
es: Agente de endurecimiento natural
et: Looduslik tardaine
fr: Agent de fermeté naturel
ga: Feidhmíonn nádúrtha
hr: prirodni učvršćivač
hu: Természetes szilárdítóanyag
it: Agente di resistenza naturale
lt: Natūralus kietiklis
lv: Dabīgs cietinātājs
mt: Aġent li jissoda naturali
nb: Naturlig smaksforsterker
nl: Natuurlijk verstevigingsmiddel
pt: Agente de endurecimento natural
ro: Agent de întărire natural
ru: натуральный уплотнитель
sk: Prírodné stužovadlo
sl: Naravni utrjevalec
sv: Naturligt konsistensmedel

en: Flavour enhancer, flavour synergist, flavor enhancer, flavor enhancers
bg: Овкусител, овкусители, усилвател на вкуса
ca: Potenciador del gust, potenciadors del gust, potenciador del sabor, potenciadors del sabor
cs: Látka zvýrazňující chuť a vůni
da: Smagsforstærker, Smagsforstærkere
de: Geschmacksverstärker
el: Ενισχυτικό γεύσης
es: Potenciador del sabor, potenciadores del sabor, Acentuadores del sabor, acentuadores del aroma, aromatizantes sinergistas, intensificador del sabor, intensificadores del sabor
et: Lõhna- ja maitsetugevdaja
fi: Arominvahvenne, Arominvahvennetta, Arominvahventeet, Arominvahventeita, Aromivahvenne, Aromivahvennetta, Aromivahventeen, Aromivahventeita
fr: Exhausteur de goût, exhausteurs de goût, Exaltateur d'arôme, agent de sapidité, activateur d'arôme, exaltateur de goût, exhausteur d'arôme, exhausteurs de saveur, exhausteur de saveur
ga: Méadaitheoir blais
hr: pojačivač okusa, pojačivači okusa, sirup pojačivač okusa, pojačivač arome, pojačivači arome, pojačivači aroma, poboljšivač, smjesa poboljšivača
hu: Ízfokozó, Ízfokozók
it: Esaltatore di sapidità, esaltatori di sapidità
lt: Aromato ir skonio stipriklis
lv: Garšas pastiprinātājs
mt: Tejjieb il-ħwawar
nb: Smaksforsterker, Smaksforsterkere
nl: Smaakversterker, Smaakversterkers
pl: Wzmacniacz smaku, Wzmacniacze smaku
pt: Intensificador de sabor
ro: Potențiator de aromă, potenţiatori de aromă
ru: Ароматизатор, ароматизаторы, усилители вкуса и аромата, усилитель вкуса и аромата, вкусоароматические-вещества, усилитель вкуса, aроматизаторы
sk: Stimulátor, zvýrazňovač chuti
sl: Ojačevalec arome
sv: Smakförstärkare
uk: ароматизатор, ароматизатори
zh: 增味劑

en: Flour treatment agent, dough conditioner, dough strengthening agent, flour bleaching agent, flour improver, flour treatment agent
bg: Агент за обработка на брашното, агент за третиране на брашното, агенти за обработка на брашна
ca: Agent de tractament de la farina, agents de tractament de la farina
cs: Látka zlepšující mouku
da: Melbehandlingsmiddel
de: Mehlbehandlungsmittel
el: Βελτιωτικό αλεύρων
es: Agente de tratamiento de la harina, agentes de tratamiento de la harina, acondicionadores de masa, acondicionador de masa, blanqueadores de las harinas, blanqueador de la harina, mejoradores de harinas, mejorador de la harina, reforzadores de la masa, reforzador de la masa, mejorante, mejorante panario
et: Jahu parendaja
fi: Jauhonparanne, Jauhoparannetta, Jauhonparanteet, Jauhonparanteita
fr: Agent de traitement de la farine, agents de traitement de la farine, agent de traitement de farine, agent de blanchiment de la farine, agent de conditionnement des pâtes, agent de réhaussement des pâtes, améliorant de la farine
ga: Oibreán plúrchóireála
hr: tvar za tretiranje brašna, tvari za tretiranje brašna, tvar za rahljenje tijesta, sladilo za rahljenje, sredstvo za tretiranje brašna
hu: Lisztkezelő szer, lisztkezelőszer, lisztjavító szer, lisztjavítószer
it: Agente di trattamento della farina, agenti di trattamento della farina, agente di trattamento delle farine
lt: Miltų apdorojimo medžiaga
lv: Miltu apstrādes līdzeklis
mt: Aġent għat-trattament tad-dqiq
nb: Melbehandlingsmiddel
nl: Meelverbeteraar, Meelverbeteraars
pl: Środek do przetwarzania mąki, Środki do przetwarzania mąki
pt: Agente de tratamento da farinha
ro: Agent de tratare a făinii, agenți de tratare a făinii
sk: Múku upravujúca látka
sl: Sredstvo za obdelavo moke
sv: Mjölbehandlingsmedel

en: Foaming agent, aerating agent, foaming agent, whipping agent
bg: Пенители
ca: Escumant, escumants, agent escumant, agents escumants
cs: Pěnotvorná látka, pěnotvorné látky
da: Skumdannende middel
de: Schaummittel
el: Αφριστικοί παράγοντες
es: Espumante, espumantes, agente de aireación, agente de batido, agente espumante, agentes espumantes
et: Vahustusaine
fi: Vaahdotusaine, Vaahdotusainetta, Vaahdotusaineet, Vaahdotusaineita
fr: Agent moussant, agent d'aération, agent fouettant, moussant, pour fouetter
ga: Oibreáin chúrtha
hu: Habosítószer
it: Agente schiumogeno, agenti schiumogeni
lt: Putojimą sukelianti medžiaga
lv: Putu veidotājs
mt: Aġent li jagħmel ir-ragħwa
nl: Schuimmiddel, Schuimmiddelen
pl: Substancja pianotwórcza, Substancje pianotwórcze
pt: Agente espumante
ro: Agenți de spumare
sk: Penotvorná látka
sl: Sredstvo za penjenje
sv: Skumbildande medel

en: Gelling agent, gelifier
bg: Желиращ агент
ca: Gelificant, gelificants, agent gelificant, agents gelificants
cs: Želírující látka, želírující látky
da: Geleringsmiddel, Geleringsmidler
de: Geliermittel
el: Πηκτωματογόνο
es: gelificante, gelificantes, agente gelificante, agentes gelificantes
et: Želeeriv aine
fi: Hyytelöimisaine, Hyytelöimisainetta, Hyytelöimisaineet, Hyytelöimisaineita
fr: Gélifiant, Agent gélifiant
ga: Oibreán glóthúcháin
hr: tvar za želiranje, sredstvo za želiranje
hu: Zselésítőanyag, zselésítő anyag, zselésítő
it: Gelificante, gelificanti, agente gelificante, agenti gelificanti, gelidificante
ja: ゲル化剤
lt: Stingdiklis
lv: Recinātājs
mt: Aġent li jgħaqqad f’ġel
nl: Geleermiddel, Geleermiddelen
pl: Substancja żelująca, Substancje żelujące
pt: Gelificante, gelificantes
ro: Agent gelatinizant
ru: загустители, агент желирующий, желирующий агент
sk: Želírujúca látka
sl: Želirno sredstvo
sv: Geleringsmedel, Geleringmedel

en: Glazing agent, coating agent, film forming agent, polishing agent, sealing agent, surface-finishing agent
bg: Глазиращ агент
ca: Agent de recobriment
cs: Lešticí látka, lešticí látky
da: Overfladebehandlingsmiddel, Overfladebehandlingsmidler
de: Überzugsmittel
el: Υλικό για γλασάρισμα
es: Agente de recubrimiento, Agente de glaseado, agente de abrillantado, agente de acabado en superficie, agente de glaseado, agente de revestimiento, agente formadores de película, agente sellantes
et: Glaseeraine
fi: Pintakäsittelyaine, Pintakäsittelyainetta, Pintakäsittelyaineet, Pintakäsittelyaineita
fr: Agent d’enrobage, agents d'enrobage, agent de conditionnement hermétique, agent de finition superficielle, agent de polissage, filmogène
ga: Oibreán glónrúcháin
hr: sredstva za glaziranje, sredstvo za glaziranje, tvar za poliranje, tvari za poliranje, zaštitne kulture
hu: Fényezőanyag, bevonószer, bevonó
it: Agente di rivestimento, agenti di rivestimento
ja: 光沢剤
lt: Glajinė medžiaga
lv: Glazētājviela
mt: Aġent li jagħmel l-ikel ileqq
nb: Overflatebehandlingsmiddel, Overflatebehandlingsmidler
nl: Glansmiddel, Glansmiddelen
pl: Substancja glazurująca, Substancje glazurujące, środki pokrywające
pt: Agente de revestimento
ro: Agent de glazurare
sk: Povlaková látka, poleva, leštiaca látka
sl: Sredstvo za glaziranje
sv: Ytbehandlingsmedel, Glansmedel

en: Humectant, moisture retention agent, water retention agent, wetting agent, moisture retention
bg: Влагозадържащ агент
ca: Humectant
cs: Zvlhčující látka, zvlhčující látky
da: fugtighedsbevarende middel, fugtighedsbevarende midler
de: Feuchthaltemittel
el: Υγροσκοπικό μέσο
es: Humectante, agente humectante, agente de retención del agua, agentes de retención de la humedad
et: Niiskusesäilitaja
fi: Kosteudensäilyttäjä, Kosteudensäilyttäjää, Kosteudensäilyttäjät, Kosteudensäilyttäjiä, Humektantti, Humektanttia, Humektantit, Humektantteja
fr: Humectant, agent de rétention d'eau, agent de rétention d'humidité, mouillant, agent mouillant
ga: Taisleán
hr: tvar za zadržavanje vlage, humektant, sredstvo za zadržavanje vlage, tvari za zadržavanje vlage
hu: Nedvesítőszer
it: Umidificante, umidificanti, agente umidificante, agenti umidificanti, umettante, umettanti
ja: 保湿剤
lt: Drėgmę išlaikanti medžiaga
lv: Mitrumuzturētājs
nb: Fuktighetsbevarer
nl: Bevochtigingsmiddel
pl: Substancja utrzymująca wilgoć, Substancje utrzymujące wilgoć, Substancja utrzymująca wilgotność, Substancje utrzymujące wilgotność
pt: Humidificante, humidificantes
ro: Agent de umezire
ru: влагоудерживающий агент, влагоудерживающие агенты, агент влагоудерживающий, агент-влагоудерживающий
sk: Zvlhčovadlo
sv: Fuktighetsbevarande medel
zh: 水分保持劑

en: Modified starch
bg: Модифицирано нишесте, модифицирана скорбяла
ca: Midó modificat
cs: Modifikovaný škrob
da: Modificeret stivelse
de: Modifizierte Stärke, Modifizierte Stärken
el: Τροποποιημένο άμυλο
es: Almidón modificado
et: Modifitseeritud tärklis
fi: Muunnettu tärkkelys, Muunnettua tärkkelystä, Muunnetut tärkkelykset, Muunnettuja tärkkelyksiä
fr: Amidon modifié
ga: Stáirse modhnaithe
hu: Módosított keményítő
it: Amido modificato, amidi modificati
lt: Modifikuotas krakmolas
lv: Modificēta ciete
mt: Lamtu mmodifikat
nl: Gemodificeerd zetmeel
pl: Skrobia modyfikowana, skrobie modyfikowane
pt: Amido modificado
ro: Amidon modificat
sk: Modifikovaný škrob
sl: Modificirani škrob
sv: Modifierad stärkelse

en: Packaging gas
ar: غاز تعبئة وتغليف
bg: Опаковъчен газ
ca: Gas d'envasament
cs: Balicí plyn
da: Pakkegas
de: Packgas, Verpackungsgas
el: Αέριο συσκευασίας
es: Gas de envasado, Gases de envasado
et: Pakendamisgaas
fi: Pakkauskaasu, Pakkauskaasua, Pakkauskaasut, Pakkauskaasuja
fr: Gaz de conditionnement
ga: Gás pacáistithe
hr: plin za pakiranje, plin za pakiranje
hu: Csomagológáz
it: Gas di confezionamento
ja: 包装ガス
ko: 포장 가스
lt: Pakavimo dujos
lv: Iepakojuma gāze
mt: Gass tal-ippakkjar
nl: Verpakkingsgas
pl: Gaz do pakowania
pt: Gás de embalagem
ro: Gaz de ambalare
ru: Упаковочный газ
sk: Baliaci plyn
sl: Plin za pakiranje
sv: Förpackningsgas
zh: 包装气体

en: Preservative, antimicrobial preservative, antimicrobial synergist, antimould and antirope agent, antimycotic agent, bacteriophage control agent, fungistatic agent, natural mold inhibitor, maintain freshness, protect flavor
ar: مادة حافظة
bg: Консервант, консерванти
ca: Conservant, conservants, conservador, conservadors
cs: Konzervant
da: Konserveringsmiddel, Konserveringsmidler, Konservering
de: Konservierungsstoff, Konservierungsstoffe, Konservierungsmittel
el: Συντηρητικό
es: Conservante, conservantes, Conservador, conservadores, agente conservador, agentes conservadores, sustancias conservadoras, sustancia conservadora, agente antimicótico, agente de control de bacteriófagos, agente fungistático, agentes inhibidores de mohos y hongos filamentosos, conservadores antimicrobianos, conservador antimicrobiano, preservante
et: Säilitusaine, säilitusained
fi: Säilöntäaine, Säilöntäainetta, Säilöntäaineet, Säilöntäaineita
fr: Conservateur, agent conservateur, agent antimoisissure et antifilant, agent antimoisissure, antifilant, agent antimycoses, agent de conservation, agent de conservation antimicrobien, agent de contrôle bactériologique, antimicrobien synergique, agent antimicrobien, antimicrobien, fongiostatique, agent antifongique
ga: Leasaitheach
he: חומר משמר
hr: konzervans, konzervansi, tvar za zadržavanje svježine, tvar za održavanje svježine
hu: Tartósítószer, tartósítószerek
is: Rotvarnarefni
it: Conservante, conservanti, agente conservante, agenti conservanti
ja: 保存料
lt: Konservantas
lv: konservants, konservanti
mt: Preservattiv
nb: Konserveringsmiddel, Konserveringsmidler
nl: Conserveermiddel, Conserveermiddelen, conserveringsmiddelen
no: konserveringsmiddel
pl: substancja konserwująca, substancje konserwujące, środek konserwujący, konserwant, konserwanty
pt: Conservante, conservantes
ro: Conservant, conservanți
ru: Консервант, консерванты
sk: Konzervačná látka, konzervačne latky
sl: Konzervans
sv: Konserveringsmedel, Konservering, färskhållare
uk: консервант

en: fruit preservative
ar: حافظة فواكه
bg: консервант за плодове
ca: conservant de fruita
cs: konzervant ovoce
da: frugtkonserveringsmiddel
de: Fruchtkonserve
el: συντηρητικό φρούτων
es: conservante de frutas
et: puuviljakonservant
fa: نگهدارنده میوه
fi: hedelmäsäilöntäaine
fr: conservateur de fruit, conservateur du fruit
ga: leasaitheach torthaí
he: חומר משמר פירות
hr: konzervans za voće
hu: gyümölcskonzerv
id: pengawet buah
it: conservante della frutta
ja: 果物保存料
ko: 과일 방부제
lt: vaisių konservantas
lv: augļu konservants
mk: конзерванс за овошје
mt: preservattiv tal-frott
nl: fruitconserveermiddel
no: fruktkonserveringsmiddel
pl: konserwant owoców
pt: conservante de frutas
ro: conservant de fructe
ru: консервант для фруктов
sk: konzervant na ovocie
sl: konzervans za sadje
sq: konservues frutash
sv: fruktkonserveringsmedel
th: สารกันบูดผลไม้
tr: meyve koruyucu
uk: консервант для фруктів
vi: chất bảo quản trái cây
zh: 水果防腐剂

en: natural preservative
ar: مادة حافظة طبيعية
bg: естествен консервант
ca: conservant natural
cs: přírodní konzervant, přírodní konzervanty
da: naturligt konserveringsmiddel
de: natürliches Konservierungsmittel
el: φυσικό συντηρητικό
es: conservante natural
et: looduslik säilitusaine
fi: luonnollinen säilöntäaine
fr: conservateur naturel
ga: leasaitheach nádúrtha
he: חומר משמר טבעי
hr: prirodno sredstvo za konzerviranje
hu: természetes tartósítószer
it: conservante naturale
ja: 天然防腐剤
ko: 천연 방부제
lt: natūralus konservantas
lv: dabīgs konservants
mk: природен конзерванс
mt: preservattiv naturali
nl: natuurlijk conserveermiddel
pl: naturalny konserwant
pt: conservante natural
ro: conservant natural
ru: натуральный консервант
sk: prírodný konzervant
sl: naravni konzervans
sv: naturligt konserveringsmedel
th: สารกันบูดจากธรรมชาติ
tr: doğal koruyucu
uk: натуральний консервант
zh: 天然防腐剂

en: Propellent gas, propellant gas, propellent, propellant
ca: gas propellent
da: Drivgas
de: Treibgas
el: Προωστικό αέριο
es: Gas propulsor
et: Propellent
fi: Ponneaine, Ponneainetta, Ponneaineet, Ponneaineita
fr: Gaz propulseur, Propulseur
ga: Gás tiomána
hr: potisni plin
hu: Hajtógáz
it: Gas propulsore
lt: Suslėgtosios dujos
lv: Propelents
mt: Gass propellent
nl: Drijfgas, drijfgassen
pl: Gaz nośny, Gazy nośne
pt: Gás propulsor
ro: Agent de propulsare
sk: Hnací plyn
sv: Drivgas

en: Raising agent, leavening
bg: набухвател, набухватели
cs: Kypřicí látka, kypřicí látky, kypřidlo
da: Hævemiddel, Hævemidler
de: Backtriebmittel
el: Διογκωτικό αρτοποιίας
es: Gasificante, Leudante, Agente leudante
et: Kergitusaine, kergitusained
fi: Nostatusaine, Nostatusainetta, Nostatusaineet, Nostatusaineita
fr: Agent levant, agent de levuration, poudres levantes, poudre à lever, poudres à lever, poudre levante
ga: Oibreán éiritheach
hr: sredstvo za rahljenje, tvar za rahljenje, tvari za rahljenje, tvar za rahljenje za dizanje tijesta, tvari za rahljenje za dizanje tijesta, tvari za rahljenje za dizanje tijesto, tvar za rahlanje, tvar za rahljanje, tvari za podizanje, sredstva za dizanje
hu: Térfogatnövelő szer, térfogatnövelő szerek
is: Lyftiefni
it: Agente lievitante, agenti lievitanti, lievitante, lievitanti
ja: 膨脹剤, 発酵種
lt: Tešlos kildymo medžiaga
lv: Irdinātājs
mt: Aġent li jgħolli l-ikel
nb: Hevemiddel, Hevemidler
nl: Rijsmiddel
pl: Substancja spulchniająca, Substancje spulchniające, środki spulchniające
pt: Levedante
ro: Agent de afânare, agenti de afânare
ru: Разрыхлитель, Разрыхлители
sk: Kypriaca látka
sl: Potisni plin
sv: Jäsningsmedel, Jäsmedel
th: สารช่วยให้ฟู

en: Sequestrant
bg: Комплексообразуватели
ca: Segrestant, quelant, quelants, agent quelant, agents quelants
cs: Sekvestrant
da: Kompleksdannere
de: Komplexbildner
el: Συμπλοκοποιητές
eo: Sekvestranto
es: Secuestrante, secuestrantes, agente quelante, agentes quelantes, agente secuestrante, agentes secuestrantes
et: Sekvestrant
fi: Kompleksinmuodostaja, Kompleksinmuodostajaa, Kompleksinmuodostajat, Kompleksinmuodostajia
fr: Séquestrant
ga: Leithliseoir
hu: Kelátképző anyag
it: Sequestrante, sequestranti, agente sequestrante, agenti sequestranti
ja: 金属イオン封鎖剤
lt: Atskyriklis
lv: Sekvestrants
mt: Aġenti sekwestranti
nl: Complexvormer, Complexvormers
pl: sekwestrant, Sekwestranty
pt: Sequestrante
ro: Agenți de sechestrare
sk: Komplexotvorné látky, sekvestranty
sl: Sredstvo za vzhajanje
sv: Komplexbildare
vi: Phụ gia cô lập
zh: 螯合剂

en: Stabiliser, stabilizer, binder, colloidal stabilizer, emulsion stabilizer, foam stabilizer, stabilizer synergist, stabilizers, stabilizing agent, binding mixes
bg: Стабилизатор, стабилизатори
ca: Estabilitzador, estabilitzadors, estabilizants, estabilitzant, estabilitzants, estabilitzat
cs: Stabilizátor, stabilizátory
da: Stabilisator, Stabilisatorer
de: Stabilisator, Stabilisatoren, Bindemittel
el: Σταθεροποιητής, σταθεροποιητές
es: Estabilizador, estabilizadores, estabilizadores coloidales, estabilizadores de emulsión, estabilizadores de espuma, estabilizador coloidal, estabilizador de emulsión, estabilizador de espuma, sinergistas, estabilizante, estabilizantes, ligante
et: Stabilisaator
fi: Stabilointiaine, Stabilointiainetta, Stabilointiaineet, Stabilointiaineita, sideaine, sidonta-aine, sidonta-aineet
fr: Stabilisant, liant, stabilisateur colloïdal, stabilisateur d'émulsion, stabilisateur de mousse, agent stabilisant, stabilisateur, stabilisateurs
ga: Cobhsaitheoir
hr: stabilizator, stabilizatori
hu: Stabilizátor, stabilizátorok, kötőanyag
is: bindiefni
it: Stabilizzante, stabilizzanti, agente stabilizzante, agenti stabilizzanti, legante, leganti
ja: 増粘安定剤, 糊料, 安定剤, 結着剤
lt: Stabilizatorius
lv: Stabilizētājs
mk: стабилизатор, стабилизатори
mt: Stabbilizzatur
nb: Stabilisator, Stabilisatorer
nl: Stabilisator, Stabilisatoren
pl: Stabilizator, Stabilizatory, substancje stabilizujące
pt: Estabilizador, Estabilizadores, estabilizante
ro: Stabilizator, stabilizatori
ru: Стабилизатор, стабилизаторы
sk: Stabilizátor
sl: Stabilizator, Vezivo
sv: Stabiliseringsmedel, Stabiliseringsämne, Stabilisator, Stabilisatorer, Stabilisering, Konsistensgivare, bindningsämnen
uk: стабілізатор

en: natural stabilizer
da: naturlig stabilisator
it: stabilizzante naturale

en: colour stabiliser, color stabilizer
da: farvestabilisator
sv: färgstabilisator

en: Sweetener, bulk sweetener, intense sweetener, natural sweetener
bg: Подсладител, подсладители
ca: Edulcorant, esdulcorants
cs: Sladidlo, sladidla
da: Sødestof, Sødestoffer, Kunstigt sødemiddel, sødemiddel
de: süßungsmittel, süssungsmittel, sußungsmittel, Süßstoffe
el: Γλυκαντικό
es: Edulcorante, Endulzante, edulcorante intenso, edulcorante masivo, edulcorante natural
et: Magusaine
fi: Makeutusaine, Makeutusainetta, Makeutusaineet, Makeutusaineita
fr: Édulcorant, édulcorant de charge, édulcorant intense
ga: Milseoir
hr: sladila, sladilo, zaslađivač, zaslađivači, zaslađivanje
hu: Édesítőszer, édesítőszerek
it: Edulcorante, edulcoranti, dolcificante, dolcificanti
ja: 甘味料
lt: saldiklis
lv: saldinātājs, saldinātāji
mk: сладила
mt: Dolċifikant
nb: Søtningsmiddel, Søtstoff, Søtstoffer
nl: Zoetstof, Zoetstoffen
pl: Substancja słodząca, Substancje słodzące, słodzik, słodziki, substancję słodzącą
pt: Edulcorante
ro: Îndulcitor
ru: подсластитель, подсластители, заменитель сахара
sk: Sladidlo, sladidlá
sl: sladila, sladilo, sladidlá
sv: Sötningsmedel
zh: 甜味劑